Illinois, session 104th, HB3914.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly:  4ARTICLE 15    Section 5. The sum of $17,697,900, or so much thereof as 6may be necessary, is appropriated from the General Revenue 7Fund to the Department of Human Rights for operational 8expenses of the Department. 9    Section 10. The sum of $50,000, or so much thereof as may 10be necessary, is appropriated from the General Revenue Fund to 11the Department of Human Rights for costs associated with the 12Commission on Discrimination and Hate Crimes. 13    Section 15. The sum of $100,000, or so much thereof as may 14be necessary, is appropriated from the Department of Human 15Rights Training and Development Fund to the Department of 16Human Rights for the purpose of funding expenses associated 17with administration. 18    Section 20. The sum of $4,794,800, or so much thereof as 19may be necessary, is appropriated from the Special Projects 20Division Fund to the Department of Human Rights for   HB3914- 2 -OMB104 00025 TGT 10025 b1operational expenses of the Department. 2    Section 25. The sum of $500,000, or so much thereof as may 3be necessary, is appropriated from the Department of Human 4Rights Special Fund to the Department of Human Rights for the 5purpose of filing expenses associated with the Department of 6Human Rights. 7    Section 30. The sum of $5,000,000, or so much thereof as 8may be necessary, is appropriated from the Hate Crimes and 9Bias Incident Prevention and Response Fund to the Department 10of Human Rights for grants and administrative expenses 11associated with the eradication of hate crimes and bias 12incidents. 13    Section 40. The sum of $1,500,000, or so much thereof as 14may be necessary, and remains unexpended at the close of 15business on June 30, 2025, from an appropriation made for such 16purpose in Article 62, Section 45 of Public Act 103-0589, as 17amended, is reappropriated from the General Revenue Fund to 18the Department of Human Rights for the purpose of providing a 19grant to the Simon Wiesenthal Center's Midwest Region Office 20in Chicago to operate a mobile museum bus for tolerance. 21    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect July 1, 222025.